Illinois, session 104th, HB1630.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nursing Home Care Act is amended by 5changing Section 2-207 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 45/2-207)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4152-207)7    Sec. 2-207. (a) Each year the Department shall publish a 8Directory for each public health region listing facilities to 9be made available to the public and be available at all 10Department offices. The Department may charge a fee for the 11Directory. The Directory shall contain, at a minimum, the 12following information:13    (1) The name and address of the facility;14    (2) The number and type of licensed beds;15    (3) The name of the cooperating hospital, if any;16    (4) The name of the administrator;17    (5) The facility telephone number; and18    (6) Membership in a provider association and accreditation 19by any such organization; and .20    (7) The facility website address, if any. 21    (b) Detailed information concerning basic costs for care 22and operating policies shall be available to the public upon 23request at each facility. However, a facility may refuse to   HB1630 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 08278 BAB 18329 b1make available any proprietary operating policies to the 2extent such facility reasonably believes such policies may be 3revealed to a competitor.4(Source: P.A. 81-1349.)